Mississippi, session 2026, HB4131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Larry Mangum of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Embezzlement on March 19, 2007, in Hinds County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years probation under the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On April 30, 2018, he was convicted for the crime of Marijuana Sell in Hinds County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released on Parole on February 14, 2019, and his sentence expired on December 2, 2019.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.